Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.162

Awards of procurement contracts to veteran-owned businesses.

All procurement contracts entered into under this chapter on or after June 10, 2010, are subject to the requirements established under RCW 43.60A.200.

[ 2010 c 5 s 8.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Construction—2010 c 5: See notes following RCW 43.60A.010.